Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1315
Supplier; notice to other wholesale purchasers; when.

The supplier shall give written notice, by certified mail, to its other purchasers at wholesale within fifteen days after receipt of the notice of the appointment of the third arbitrator.

Laws 1979, LB 207, § 15.